Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.180 is amended to read:
327.180. (1) In addition to those  moneys distributed through the State School Fund, the Depart-
ment of Education  shall award grants from the Student Investment Account. Grants shall be dis-
tributed as provided under ORS 327.195.
(2) The purposes of grants distributed under ORS 327.195 shall be to:
(a) Meet students’ mental or behavioral health needs; and
(b) Increase academic achievement for students, including reducing academic disparities for:
(A) Economically disadvantaged students, as determined based on eligibility for free or reduced
price lunches under the  United States Department of Agriculture’s current Income Eligibility
Guidelines;
(B) Students from  racial or ethnic groups that have historically experienced academic dispari-
ties, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(C) Students with disabilities;
(D) Students who are English language learners;
(E) Students who are foster children, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(F) Students who are homeless, as determined  under rules adopted by the State Board of Edu-
cation;  and
(G) Any other student groups that  have historically experienced academic disparities, as deter-
mined by the State Board of Education by rule.
(3) Grant moneys received under ORS 327.195 may be used by a grant recipient only for:
(a) Increasing instructional time, which may include:
(A) More hours or days of instructional time;
(B) Summer programs;
(C) Before-school or after-school programs; or
(D) Technological investments that minimize class time used for  assessments administered to
students.
(b) Addressing students’ health or safety needs, which may include:
(A) Social-emotional learning and development;
(B) Student mental and behavioral health;
Enrolled House Bill 2537 (HB 2537-A) Page 1
(C) Improvements to teaching and learning practices or organizational structures that  lead to
better interpersonal relationships at the school;
(D) Student health and wellness;
(E) Trauma-informed practices;
(F) School health professionals and assistants; or
(G) Facility improvements directly related to improving student health or safety.
(c) Reducing class sizes,  which may include increasing the use of instructional assistants, by
using evidence-based criteria to ensure appropriate student-teacher ratios or staff caseloads.
(d) Expanding availability of and student participation in well-rounded learning  experiences,
which may include:
(A) Developmentally appropriate and  culturally responsive early literacy practices and programs
in prekindergarten through third grade;
(B) Culturally responsive practices and  programs in grades six through eight, including learning,
counseling and student support that is connected to colleges and careers;
(C) Broadened curricular options at all grade levels, including access to:
(i) Art, music and physical education classes;
(ii) Science, technology, engineering and mathematics education;
(iii) Career and technical education,  including career and technical student organization pro-
grams and payment of student fees, costs and instructors of those programs ;
(iv) Electives that are engaging to students;
(v) Accelerated college credit programs, including dual credit  programs, International
Baccalaureate programs and advanced placement programs;
(vi) Dropout prevention programs and transition supports;
(vii) Life skills classes; or
(viii) Talented and gifted programs; or
(D) Access to licensed educators with a library media endorsement.
Passed by House April 16, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 27, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2537 (HB 2537-A) Page 2